South Dakota, session 2026, HB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-45-1 be AMENDED:
10-45-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Agricultural purposes," the producing, raising, growing, or harvesting of food or
fiber upon agricultural land, including dairy products, livestock, and crops. The
services of custom harvesters, chemical applicators, fertilizer spreaders, hay
grinders, and cultivators are considered agricultural purposes. The harvesting of
timber on land within the state is considered an agricultural purpose;
(2) "Business," any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by
such person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect;
(3) "Candy," any preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners
in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other ingredients or flavorings in the
form of bars, drops, or pieces. The term, candy, does not include any preparation
containing flour and does not require refrigeration;
(4) "Delivery charges," charges by the retailer for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, or services including transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing. The term does not include postage for direct mail;
(5) "Food" and "food ingredient," any substance, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid,
frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that is sold for ingestion or chewing by humans
and is consumed for its taste or nutritional value. The term, food, does These terms
do not include alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or prepared food:
(a) Alcoholic beverages, as defined in § 35-1-1;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 2 1281
(b) Candy;
(c) Cannabis or cannabis products, as defined in § 34-20G-1;
(c)(d) Cigarettes, as defined in § 10-50B-4;
(d)(e) Prepared food; or
(e)(f) Soft drinks; or
(g) Tobacco products, as defined in § 10-50-1;
(6) Repealed by SL 2007, ch 56, § 1.
(7)(4) "Person," any individual, firm, copartnership, joint adventure, association, limited
liability company, corporation, municipal corporation, estate, trust, business trust,
receiver, the State of South Dakota and its political subdivisions, or any group or
combination acting as a unit;
(8)(5) "Prepared food," any food:
(a) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller; two
(b) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a
single item; or food
(c) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates,
knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A, but a plate does
not include a container or packaging used to transport the food.
Prepared food does not include food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized
by the seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the Food and Drug
Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code as of January 1, 2003,
so as to prevent food borne illnesses;
(8A)(6) "Product transferred electronically," any product obtained by the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media. A product transferred electronically does
not include any intangible such as a patent, stock, bond, goodwill, trademark,
franchise, or copyright.;
(9)(7) "Relief agency," the state, and county, municipality or district thereof, or any
agency engaged in actual relief work;
(10)(8) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail," any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other
than for resale, sublease, or subrent;
(11)(9) "Retailer," any person engaged in the business of selling tangible:
(a) Tangible goods, wares, or merchandise at retail, or the furnishing of gas;
(b) Gas, electricity, water, and communication service, and tickets;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 3 1281
(c) Tickets or admissions to places of amusement and athletic events as
provided in this chapter, and the sale at retail of products; and
(d) Products transferred electronically at retail.
The term also includes does not include any person subject to the tax imposed by
§§ 10-45-4 and 10-45-5. The that engages in the isolated or occasional sale of
tangible personal property or of any product transferred electronically at retail by
a, provided the person who does not hold himself or herself itself out to the public
as engaging in the business of selling such tangible personal property or products
transferred electronically at retail does not constitute such person a retailer;
(12)(10) "Sale," any transfer, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration; and
(13) "Soft drinks," any nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial
sweeteners. The term, soft drinks, does not include any beverage that contains
milk or milk products, soy, rice of similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty
percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume; and
(14)(11) "Tangible personal property," personal property that can be seen, weighed,
measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the
senses. The term includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer
software.
Section 2. That § 10-45-2 be AMENDED:
10-45-2. There is hereby imposed a tax upon the privilege of engaging in business
as a retailer, a tax of four and two-tenths at the rate of five percent upon the gross receipts
of all sales of tangible personal property consisting of goods, wares, or merchandise,
except as otherwise provided in this chapter, sold at retail in the state to consumers or
users.
Section 3. That § 10-45-5 be AMENDED:
10-45-5. There is imposed a tax, at the rate of four and two-tenths percent set
forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts of any person from engaging or continuing in
any of the following businesses or services in this state: abstracters
(1) Abstracters;
(2) accountantsAccountants;
(3) ancillaryAncillary services;
(4) architectsArchitects;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 4 1281
(5) barbersBarbers;
(6) beautyBeauty shops;
(7) billBill collection services;
(8) blacksmithBlacksmith shops;
(9) carCar washing;
(10) dryDry cleaning;
(11) dyeingDyeing;
(12) exterminatorsExterminators;
(13) garageGarage and service stations;
(14) garmentGarment alteration;
(15) cleaningCleaning and pressing;
(16) janitorialJanitorial services and supplies;
(17) specialtySpecialty cleaners;
(18) laundryLaundry;
(19) linenLinen and towel supply;
(20) membershipMembership or entrance fees for the use of a facility or for the right to
purchase tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or
services;
(21) photographyPhotography;
(22) photoPhoto developing and enlarging;
(23) tireTire recapping;
(24) weldingWelding and all repair services, except repair services for farm machinery,
attachment units, and irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural
purposes;
(25) cableCable television; and
(26) rentalsRentals of tangible personal property, except leases of tangible personal
property between one telephone company and another telephone company, motor
vehicles as defined pursuant to § 32-5-1 leased under a single contract for more
than twenty-eight days, and mobile homes. However, the
The specific enumeration of businesses and professions made in this section does
not, in any way, limit the scope and effect of the provisions of § 10-45-4.
Section 4. That § 10-45-5.3 be AMENDED:
10-45-5.3. There is imposed, at the rate of four and two-tenths percent set forth
in § 10-45-2, an excise tax on the gross receipts of any person engaging in oil and gas
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 5 1281
field services (, group no. 138), as enumerated in the Standard Industrial Classification
Manual, 1987, as prepared by the Statistical Policy Division of the Office of Management
and Budget, Office of the President.
Section 5. That § 10-45-6 be AMENDED:
10-45-6. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts from sales, furnishing, or service of
gas, electricity, and water, including the gross receipts from such the sales by any
municipal corporation furnishing gas, and electricity, to the public in its proprietary
capacity, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, when sold at retail in the State of
South Dakota this state to consumers or users.
Section 6. That § 10-45-6.1 be AMENDED:
10-45-6.1. Except as provided in § 10-45-6.2, there is hereby imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts
from providing any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that
originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in
this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. However, the tax imposed
by this section does not apply to:
(1) Any eight hundred or eight hundred-type service, unless the service both originates
and terminates in this state;
(2) Any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication
services, including access service, for use in providing any telecommunication
service; or
(3) Any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has
been certified by the secretary of revenue to meet the criterion established in § 10-
45-6.3 and the call center has provided to the telecommunications service provider
an exemption certificate issued by the secretary indicating that it meets the
criterion.
If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the
criterion established in § 10-45-6.3, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty,
and interest.
Section 7. That § 10-45-6.2 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 6 1281
10-45-6.2. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts of mobile telecommunications services,
as defined in 4 U.S.C. § 124(7) as of (January 1, 2002), that originate and terminate in
the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in this state or
are deemed to have originated or been received in this state and to be billed or charged
to a service address in this state if the customer's place of primary use is located in this
state regardless of where the service actually originates or terminates. Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter and for purposes of the tax imposed by this section,
the tax imposed upon mobile telecommunication services must be administered in
accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 116- to 126, as in effect on, inclusive (July 28, 2000).
Section 8. That § 10-45-8 be AMENDED:
10-45-8. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there is imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts
from all sales of tickets or admissions to:
(1) Places of amusement;
(2) Athletic contests; or
(3) Events.
Section 9. That § 10-45-71 be AMENDED:
10-45-71. There is imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent on, at the rate
set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts from the transportation of passengers. The
tax imposed by this section applies to any transportation of passengers if the passenger
boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state.
Section 10. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
The rate imposed by this chapter upon the gross receipts of all sales of food and
food ingredients, as defined by § 10-45-1, is zero percent.
Section 11. That § 10-46-1 be AMENDED:
10-46-1. Terms, as used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Business," any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by
such person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 7 1281
(2) "Candy," any preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners
in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other ingredients or flavorings in the
form of bars, drops, or pieces. The term, candy, does not include any preparation
containing flour and does not require refrigeration;
(3) "Delivery charges," charges by the retailer for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, or services including transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing. The term does not include postage for direct mail;
(4) "Fair market value," the price at which a willing seller and willing buyer will trade.
Fair market value shall must be determined at the time of purchase. If a public
corporation is supplying tangible personal property or any product transferred
electronically that will is to be used in the performance of a contract, fair market
value shall must be determined pursuant to § 5-18B-7. This definition also applies
to chapter 10-45;
(5)(3) "Food" and "food ingredient," any substance, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid,
frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that is sold for ingestion or chewing by humans
and is consumed for its taste or nutritional value. The term, food, does These terms
do not includealcoholic beverages, tobacco, or prepared food:
(a) Alcoholic beverages, as defined in § 35-1-1;
(b) Candy;
(c) Cannabis or cannabis products, as defined in § 43-20G-1;
(c)(d) Cigarettes, as defined in § 10-50B-4;
(d)(e) Prepared food; or
(e)(f) Soft drinks; or
(g) Tobacco products, as defined in § 34-20G-1;
(6)(4) "Included in the measure of tax," the tangible personal property, any product
transferred electronically, or the service was purchased from a retailer licensed
under chapter 10-45 and that retailer has included the tax in the amount received
from the sale;
(7)(5) "In this state" or "in the state," within the exterior limits of the State of South
Dakota and includes all territory within such the limits owned by or ceded to the
United States of America;
(8)(6) "Prepared food," any food:
(a) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller; two
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 8 1281
(b) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a
single item; or food
(c) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates,
knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate, but does
not include a container or packaging used to transport the food.
Prepared food does not include food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized
by the seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the Food and Drug
Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code as of January 1, 2003,
so as to prevent food borne illnesses;
(8A)(7) "Product transferred electronically," any product obtained by the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media. A product transferred electronically does
not include any intangible such as a patent, stock, bond, goodwill, trademark,
franchise, or copyright.;
(9)(8) "Purchase," any transfer, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration. A transaction, whereby
the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security
for the payment of the price, is a purchase;
(10)(9) "Purchase price," shall have the same meaning as gross receipts defined in
chapter 10-45;
(11)(10) "Retailer," any person performing services in this state or engaged in the
business of selling tangible personal property or products transferred electronically
for use, storage or other consumption within the meaning of this chapter. However,
if in the opinion of the secretary of revenue, it is necessary for the efficient
administration of this chapter to regard any salesmen, representatives, truckers,
peddlers, or canvassers as agents of the dealers, distributors, supervisors,
employers, or persons under whom they operate or from whom they obtain the
tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically sold by them
irrespective of whether they are making sales on their own behalf or on behalf of
such dealers, distributors, supervisors, employers, or persons, the secretary of
revenue may so regard them and may regard the dealers, distributors, supervisors,
employers, or persons as retailers for purposes of this chapter;
(12)(11) "Retailer maintaining a place of business in the state," any retailer having or
maintaining within this state, directly or by a subsidiary, an office, distribution
house, sales house, warehouse, or other place of business, or any agents operating
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 9 1281
within the state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary, irrespective of
whether such place of business or agent is located here permanently or temporarily
or whether such retailer or subsidiary is admitted to do business within this state
pursuant to the laws of the State of South Dakota granting the rights of foreign
corporations to do business in this state;
(13)(12) "Secretary," the secretary of the Department of Revenue or any duly authorized
and appointed assistant, deputies, or agents of the secretary charged with the
administration or enforcement of this chapter;
(14) "Soft drinks," any nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial
sweeteners. The term, soft drinks, does not include any beverage that contains
milk or milk products, soy, rice of similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty
percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume;
(15)(13) "Storage," any keeping or retention in this state for use or other consumption
in the State of South Dakota for any purpose except sale in the regular course of
business;
(16)(14) "Tangible personal property," personal property that can be seen, weighed,
measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses
if furnished or delivered to consumers or users within this state. The term includes
electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software; and
(17)(15) "Use," the exercise of right or power over tangible personal property or any
product transferred electronically incidental to the ownership of that property,
except that it does not include the sale of that property in the regular course of
business. Use also includes the use of the types of services, the gross receipts from
the sale of which are to be included in the measure of the tax imposed by chapter
10-45, and the delivery or causing delivery into this state of tangible personal
property or any product transferred electronically intended to advertise any
product or service or promote or facilitate any sale to South Dakota residents.
Section 12. That § 10-46-2.1 be AMENDED:
10-46-2.1. For the privilege of using services in South Dakota this state, except
those types of services exempted by § 10-46-17.3, there is imposed on the person using
the service an excise tax equal to four and two-tenths at the rate of five percent of the
value of the services at the time they are rendered. However, this This tax may not be
imposed on any service:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 10 1281
(1) Service rendered by a related corporation, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(11),
for use by a financial institution, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(4); or on any
service § 10-43-1; or
(2) Service rendered by a financial institution, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(4)
§ 10-43-1, for use by a related corporation as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(11).
For the purposes of this section, the term, "related corporation," includes a means
a corporation associated with another as its parent or subsidiary, or in a brother-sister
relationship. The term includes a corporation, which together with the financial institution,
is part of a controlled group of corporations, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 1563 as in effect
on (January 1, 1989), except that the eighty percent ownership requirements set forth in
26 U.S.C. § 563(a)(2)(A) § 1563(a) for a brother-sister controlled group are reduced to
fifty-one percent.
For the purpose of this chapter, services rendered by an employee for the use of
the employer are not taxable.
Section 13. That § 10-46-2.2 be AMENDED:
10-46-2.2. An excise tax is imposed upon the privilege of the use of rented
tangible personal property and any product transferred electronically in this state at the
rate of four and two-tenths percent of set forth in § 10-46-2.1, on the rental payments
upon the property.
Section 14. That § 10-46-48 be AMENDED:
10-46-48. All revenue arising under the operation of Except as otherwise
provided, revenue collected pursuant to this chapter shall immediately must be turned
over to the state treasurer and by him credited to deposited in the general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the school building construction fund, established in
section 25 of this Act, two percent of the taxes collected by the secretary of the
Department of Revenue pursuant to this chapter.
Section 15. That § 10-46-58 be AMENDED:
10-46-58. There is imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent on, at the rate
set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of any transportation of passengers.
The tax imposed by this section applies to any transportation of passengers if the
passenger boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 11 1281
Section 16. That § 10-46-69 be AMENDED:
10-46-69. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of mobile telecommunications
services, as defined in 4 U.S.C. § 124(7) as of (January 1, 2002), that originate and
terminate in the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in
this state. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and for purposes of the tax
imposed by this section, the tax imposed upon mobile telecommunication services must
be administered in accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 116- to 126, as in effect on, inclusive
(July 28, 2000).
Section 17. That § 10-46-69.1 be AMENDED:
10-46-69.1. Except as provided in § 10-46-69, there is hereby imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the
use of any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that
originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in
this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. However, the The tax
imposed by this section does not apply to:
(1) Any eight hundred or eight hundred type service unless the service both originates
and terminates in this state;
(2) Any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication
services, including access service, for use in providing any telecommunication
service; or
(3) Any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has
been certified by the secretary of revenue to meet the criterion established in § 10-
45-6.3 and the call center has provided to the telecommunications service provider
an exemption certificate issued by the secretary indicating that it meets the
criterion.
If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the
criterion established in § 10-45-6.3, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty,
and interest.
Section 18. That § 10-46-69.2 be AMENDED:
10-46-69.2. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of any ancillary services.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 12 1281
Section 19. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-46:
The rate of tax imposed by this chapter upon the use, storage, or consumption in
this state of food and food ingredients is zero percent.
Section 20. That § 10-46E-1 be AMENDED:
10-46E-1. There is hereby imposed an excise tax of four and two-tenths percent,
at the rate of five percent, on the gross receipts from the sale, resale, or lease of farm
machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural
purposes. However, if If any trade-in or exchange of used farm machinery, attachment
units, and irrigation equipment is involved in the transaction, the excise tax is only due
and may only be collected on the cash difference.
Section 21. That § 10-46E-9 be AMENDED:
10-46E-9. The Except as otherwise provided, revenue from the tax imposed by
this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the school building construction fund, established in
section 25 of this Act, two percent of the taxes collected by the secretary of the
Department of Revenue pursuant to this chapter.
Section 22. That § 10-50-3 be AMENDED:
10-50-3. A tax is imposed, whether or not a sale occurs, at the following rates on
all cigarettes held in this state for sale by any person:
Class A, on cigarettes weighing not more than three pounds per thousand, seventy-
six and one-half mills twelve and one-half cents one hundred twenty-six and one-half mills
on each cigarette.
Class B, on cigarettes weighing more than three pounds per thousand, seventy-six
and one-half mills twelve and one-half cents one hundred twenty-six and one-half mills
on each cigarette.
Section 23. That § 10-58-1 be AMENDED:
10-58-1. There is imposed upon owners and operators a special amusement
excise tax of four and two-tenths five percent of the gross receipts from the sale or the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 13 1281
operation of any mechanical or electronic amusement device. The tax imposed by this
section is in lieu of the tax imposed pursuant to chapter 10-45.
Section 24. That § 10-58-5 be AMENDED:
10-58-5. The Except as otherwise provided, the tax generated by this chapter
must be deposited in the general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the school building construction fund, established in
section 25 of this Act, two percent of the taxes collected by the secretary of the
Department of Revenue pursuant to this chapter.
Section 25. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
There is created the school building construction fund, to be administered by the
Department of School and Public Lands commissioner of school and public lands, for the
purpose of making loans to school districts to construct or expand a school building, as
provided in section 26 of this Act. The Subject to the provisions of this section, the
treasurer shall deposit in the fund two percent the first sixty million dollars of the taxes
collected pursuant to:
(1) Chapter 10-45;
(2) Chapter 10-46;
(3) Chapter 10-46E; and
(4) Chapter 10-58.
If two percent of the taxes collected pursuant to subdivisions (1) to (4), inclusive,
exceed sixty million dollars in a year, the treasurer shall deposit in the fund two percent
of the taxes collected pursuant to subdivisions (1) to (4), inclusive, in excess of sixty
million dollars, but not in excess of ninety million dollars.
Any interest earned on moneys in the fund must remain in the fund. Any repayment
of the principal amount of a loan must be deposited into the fund and used for making
new loans. Money in the fund designated for loans is appropriated through the general
appropriation bill for the purposes provided in section 26 of this Act.
The commissioner of the department shall approve vouchers, and the state auditor
shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized from this fund.
Section 26. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 14 1281
The Department of School and Public Lands commissioner of school and public
lands may make loans from the school building construction fund, created in section 25 of
this Act, to a school district for the purpose of constructing or expanding a school building.
The amount of the loan may not exceed forty percent of the total cost of the construction
or expansion project. The department commissioner may use up to one percent of the
principal amount of a loan to offset the department's expenses in administering the loan.
Any loan made by the department commissioner must be provided to the district
at an interest rate of zero percent. The terms of the loan may not require collateral from
the district.
The terms of the loan must require that the payments be based on a straight and
level amortization of twenty years and be made annually over a term of twenty years,
with the first payment due one year from the date of the funding of the loan.
The department shall make available moneys from the school building construction
fund, created in section 25 of this Act, as follows:
(1) Thirty percent for the construction or expansion of a school building in a school
district that has four thousand or more students; and
(2) Seventy percent for the construction or expansion of a school building in all other
school districts.
The amount of loans made in a year under this section must exceed sixty-million
dollars and may not exceed ninety-million dollars.
For purposes of this section, a "school building" is a structure that houses the
academic instruction, extracurricular activities, and other functions of a kindergarten
through twelfth grade educational program.
Section 27. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
A school district is not eligible for a loan under section 26 of this Act if:
(1) The school district is eligible for a loan under § 11-15-8; or
(2) The municipality in which the district is headquartered is less than ten miles from
a municipality in which another school district is headquartered; or
(3) The school district has a fall enrollment of fewer than two hundred one hundred
fifty students and is not designated as a sparse school district, as defined in § 13-
13-78.
Section 28. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 15 1281
The School Finance Accountability Board within the Department of Education shall
promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, specifying:
(1) The process by which:
(a) A school district applies for a loan;
(b) The Department of Education department reviews, assesses, and approves
a school district's application; and
(c) The Department of School and Public Lands commissioner of school and
public lands disburses a loan to a school district; and
(2) The information a school district must provide when applying for a loan pursuant
to section 26 of this Act, including:
(a) The amount of money currently in the district's capital outlay fund;
(b) The amount of money the district has transferred and the number of
transfers the district has made from the capital outlay fund, pursuant to
§ 13-16-6 during the previous ten years;
(c) The district's current levy for the capital outlay fund;
(d) The district's fall enrollment for the current fiscal year; and
(e) The enrollment trends of the district during the previous ten years; and
(3) The criteria by which the Department of Education department assesses a school
district's application for a loan in accordance with section 26 of this Act, including:
(a) The minimum amount of money, in proportion to the district's fall
enrollment, that must currently be in a district's capital outlay fund;
(b) The maximum amount of money a district may have transferred from the
capital outlay fund, pursuant to § 13-16-6 during the previous ten years;
(c) The maximum levy a district may currently have set for the district's capital
outlay fund; and
(d) The minimum increase necessary in the district's capital outlay levy to be
sufficient for the district to repay the loan.
Section 29. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
On or before August first of each year, the Department of School and Public Lands
commissioner of school and public lands shall submit a report to the special committee,
created in § 4-8A-2, detailing the number, amounts, and recipients of loans provided by
the school building construction fund created in section 25 of this Act, and other relevant
information pertaining to the fund or program, as requested by the committee.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1281A 16 1281
Section 30. That 2023 Session Laws, chapter 32, § 19 be REPEALED:
Section 31. The amendments to the Code sections in sections 1 to 17, inclusive,
of this Act are repealed on June 30, 2027, and those Code sections will revert in word and
substance to that which existed immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.